Ohio, session 136, HB384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.102 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.102. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of United States route number twenty-two between mile marker nineteen and mile marker twenty-two, within Harrison county, shall be known as the "Staff Sergeant Melvin Trushel, Sr. Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.